North Carolina statutes. Chapter 108A. Social Services.
Article 7. Hospital Provider Assessment Act.

§§ 108A-120 through 108A-128.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2020-88, s. 15.1(a), effective July 1, 2021.

History.

G.S. 108A-120

; 2011-11, s. 1; repealed by 2020-88, s. 15.1(a), effective July 1, 2021. G.S. 108A-121; 2011-11, s. 1; 2013-360, s. 12H.19(a); 2014-100, s. 12H.17(a); repealed by 2020-88, s. 15.1(a), effective July 1, 2021. G.S. 108A-122; 2011-11, s. 1; 2015-241, s. 12H.7; repealed by 2020-88, s. 15.1(a), effective July 1, 2021. G.S. 108A-123; 2011-11, s. 1; 2013-397, s. 10; repealed by 2020-88, s. 15.1(a), effective July 1, 2021. G.S. 108A-124; 2011-11, s. 1; 2013-360, s. 12H.19(b); repealed by 2020-88, s. 15.1(a), effective July 1, 2021. G.S. 108A-125; 2011-11, s. 1; repealed by 2020-88, s. 15.1(a), effective July 1, 2021. G.S. 108A-126; 2011-11, s. 1; repealed by 2020-88, s. 15.1(a), effective July 1, 2021. G.S. 108A-127; 2011-11, s. 1; repealed by 2020-88, s. 15.1(a), effective July 1, 2021. G.S. 108A-128; 2013-360, s. 12H.19(c); 2014-100, s. 12H.17(b); repealed by 2020-88, s. 15.1(a), effective July 1, 2021.

§ 108A-129.

Reserved for future codification purposes.